Maryland, session 2026, HB0261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–102.
(a) The following procurement methods are authorized at the procurement
officer’s discretion, where applicable:
– 1 –

Ch. 265 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) competitive sealed bids under § 13–103 of this subtitle;
(2) competitive sealed proposals under § 13–104 or § 13–105 of this
subtitle;
(3) noncompetitive negotiation under § 13–106 of this subtitle;
(4) sole source procurement under § 13–107 of this subtitle;
(5) emergency or expedited procurement under § 13–108 of this subtitle;
(6) small procurement under § 13–109 of this subtitle;
(7) an intergovernmental cooperative purchasing agreement under §
13–110 of this subtitle;
(8) auction bids under § 13–111 of this subtitle;
(9) architectural, engineering, and land surveying services qualification
based selection under § 13–112 of this subtitle;
(10) master contracting under § 13–113 of this subtitle; [or]
(11) legislative fast–track procurements under § 13–117 of this subtitle; OR
(12) COMPETITIVE PROOF OF CONCEPT PROCUREMENTS UNDER §
13–116 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
13–116.
(a) In this section, “proof of concept” means a test, evaluation, demonstration, or
pilot project of a good, service, or technology in a real–world environment to evaluate
whether the good, service, or technology can be successfully deployed and is beneficial to
the State.
(b) (1) A competitive proof of concept procurement is a formal competitive
procurement method that may be used to solicit proposals for the conduct of a proof of
concept [prior to] AND PARTICIPATION IN SUBSEQUENT PHASES OF THE
PROCUREMENT, INCLUDING full implementation OR DEPLOYMENT when the head of a
unit determines the process to be appropriate and in the best interests of the unit,
including:
(i) testing software–as–a–service or off–the–shelf software;
(ii) testing new, innovative products or services; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 265
(iii) testing a product or service conceptualized or conceived of by a
unit of State government.
(2) (i) 1. After obtaining the approval of the head of the unit and
before conducting a competitive proof of concept procurement, the unit shall obtain
approval from [the Secretary of Information Technology, or the Secretary’s designee] THE
CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, OR THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER’S
DESIGNEE.
2. THE REQUEST FOR APPROVAL UNDER THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL DEMONSTRATE THAT CONDUCTING A COMPETITIVE PROOF
OF CONCEPT PROCUREMENT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE.
(II) IF THE PROCUREMENT IS FOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY,
BEFORE CONDUCTING A COMPETITIVE PROOF OF CONCEPT PROCUREMENT, THE
UNIT SHALL OBTAIN APPROVAL FROM THE SECRETARY OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE.
[(ii)] (III) The Secretary of Information Technology may grant
approval for a competitive proof of concept procurement FOR INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY if the unit:
1. has sufficient internal resources to manage the proof of
concept, including human capital, subject matter expertise, and technological
infrastructure, or has the means to obtain these resources; and
2. enters into a memorandum of understanding with the
Department of Information Technology that requires regular status updates, vendor
capacity, and any other information necessary for the Department of Information
Technology to evaluate whether the proof of concept can be successfully deployed and is
beneficial to the State.
(c) (1) [A competitive proof of concept procurement may be conducted through
the issuance of a solicitation by any method of procurement authorized under this Division
II.
(2)] A competitive proof of concept procurement solicitation shall include a
statement of:
(i) the scope of work, STATEMENT OF NEED, or project description,
including the intended use, quantity, estimated time frame for the proof of concept, and
anticipated number of proof of concept awards that will be made; and
– 3 –

Ch. 265 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) the factors, including price, that will be used AT EACH PHASE in
evaluating proposals and the relative importance of each.
[(3)] (2) A solicitation may be distributed to vendors known to offer goods
or services within the scope of the proof of concept and shall[, except for procurements
under $15,000 not otherwise required by law to be posted,] be posted on eMaryland
Marketplace Advantage[, in accordance with the policies and procedures under subsection
(g) of this section].
(d) After receipt of proposals but before award of a procurement contract, a unit
may:
(1) conduct discussions with AND RECEIVE CLARIFICATIONS FROM an
offeror [to ensure full understanding of:
(i) the requirements of the unit, as set forth in the request for
proposals; and
(ii) the proposal submitted by the offeror; and];
(2) request product samples for testing by the unit or a demonstration of a
product or service and use these samples or demonstrations in its evaluation process; AND
(3) ALLOW OFFERORS REASONABLY SUSCEPTIBLE OF BEING
SELECTED FOR AWARD TO PARTICIPATE IN ALL SUBSEQUENT PHASES OF THE
PROCUREMENT INCLUDING SUBMISSION OF BEST AND FINAL OFFERS.
(e) (1) A [request for] UNIT MAY ISSUE A CONTRACT TO EACH OFFEROR
REASONABLY SUSCEPTIBLE OF BEING SELECTED FOR AWARD TO DELIVER product
samples for testing or PROVIDE A demonstration made under subsection (d)(2) of this
section [shall be issued to all offerors deemed reasonable at the time of the request].
(2) A CONTRACT AWARDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT
PRECLUDE A VENDOR FROM CONTINUING TO PARTICIPATE IN SUBSEQUENT PHASES
OF THE PROCUREMENT.
(f) [A unit may award one or more of the proposals a contract for the proof of
concept.
(g) A vendor awarded a proof of concept procurement shall be eligible to bid on a
procurement to implement a proposal related to the proof of concept procurement] A UNIT
MAY AWARD ONE OR MORE CONTRACTS FOR FULL IMPLEMENTATION OR
DEPLOYMENT OF THE GOOD, SERVICE, OR TECHNOLOGY EVALUATED DURING THE
PROOF OF CONCEPT IF IT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 265
(G) A UNIT SHALL PUBLISH NOTICE OF A CONTRACT AWARDED UNDER THIS
SECTION IN EXCESS OF THE SMALL PROCUREMENT AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN § 13–109
OF THIS SUBTITLE IN EMARYLAND MARKETPLACE ADVANTAGE.
(h) The Department of General Services, in consultation with the Department of
Information Technology, shall adopt REGULATIONS, policies, and procedures for the
development and implementation of competitive proof of concept procurements.
14–302.
(a) (2) (I) The Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, the Chief
Procurement Officer, and the Attorney General, shall establish guidelines for each unit to
consider when determining the appropriate minority business enterprise participation
percentage goal for a procurement contract in accordance with paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
(II) FOR A COMPETITIVE PROOF OF CONCEPT PROCUREMENT
CONDUCTED UNDER § 13–116 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION PERCENTAGE GOAL, IF ANY, SHALL BE ESTABLISHED
AT A PHASE SPECIFIED IN THE SOLICITATION DOCUMENTS.
14–502.1.
(b) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A procurement with a total dollar value of $1,000,000 or less shall be
designated for the small business reserve.
(2) Each unit or agency shall implement this subsection in a manner
consistent with all applicable statutes, including the requirements of Subtitle 3 of this title.
(3) A COMPETITIVE PROOF OF CONCEPT PROCUREMENT CONDUCTED
UNDER § 13–116 OF THIS ARTICLE MAY BE EXEMPT FROM DESIGNATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS DETERMINES THAT IT IS NOT
PRACTICABLE TO DESIGNATE THE PROCUREMENT FOR THE SMALL BUSINESS
RESERVE.
14–602.
(b) (1) [Solicitation] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, SOLICITATION documents shall state the expected percentage of
veteran–owned small business enterprise participation based, in part, on:
– 5 –

Ch. 265 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(1)] (I) the potential contracting opportunities available in the
procurement contract, including both prime contracting and subcontracting opportunities,
as determined through analysis of the scope of the work presented in the solicitation
documents; and
[(2)] (II) the availability of veteran–owned small business enterprises to
respond competitively to the potential contracting opportunities.
(2) FOR A COMPETITIVE PROOF OF CONCEPT PROCUREMENT
CONDUCTED UNDER § 13–116 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE EXPECTED PERCENTAGE OF
VETERAN–OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION, IF ANY, SHALL BE
ESTABLISHED AT A PHASE SPECIFIED IN THE SOLICITATION DOCUMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 6 –